src/phonology/gle-phon.nouns.xfscript
! Noun (Gaeilge) Replace Rules
! Elaine Uí Dhonnchadha
! Apr 2004
! Last Part - tidy up FLASH flags
!
!**************************************************************************
read regex [%^FB -> []]		! broadened
.o.
[%^FC -> []]		! last syllable changed
.o.
[%^FH -> []]		! séimhiú i.e. h inserted
.o.
[%^FU -> []]		! urú
.o.
[%^FV -> []]		! prefing of vowel-initial words
.o.
[%^FS -> []]		! slenderised
.o.
[%^FY -> []]		! syncopated
.o.
[%^FT -> []]		! verb stem truncated
.o.
[%^CB -> []]		! compound boundary e.g. from pref + verb/adj scripts
;
! Noun (Gaeilge) Replace Rules
! Elaine Uí Dhonnchadha
! May 2001
! Last Part - tidy up
!
!**************************************************************************
read regex [ %^AE -> a e]
.o.
![ %^IA -> i a]
!.o.
[ %^AO -> a o]
.o.
[ %^UA -> u a]
.o.
[%^F -> []]
.o.
[%^M -> []]
.o.
[%^N -> []]
.o.
[%^G -> []]
.o.
[%^V -> []]
.o.
[%^CB -> []]
;
! Noun (Gaeilge) Replace Rules
! Elaine Uí Dhonnchadha
! May 1998
!
! Leathú (^Lea) :Broadening of slender words
! Usually by removing "i"
! but also by substituting vowels eg io->ea
! and also by inserting a broad vowel eg í->ío
!
! 2004 
! included %^FC and %^FY in Cons
! included %^FH in i -> ea rule
!**************************************************************************

define Cons  b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z|%^FC|%^FY;
read regex o i  -> %^FB a || r _ Cons+ %^Lea	! roinn -> rann 
.o.

 i -> %^FB a || [e|é] _ Cons+ %^Lea	! greim(m) -> greama, spéir -> spéartha
.o.
 
 i -> %^FB e a || [b|c|m|r] (%^FH h) %^X _ Cons+ %^Lea 	
				! binn -> beanna, rith -> reatha
				! cith(m) -> ceatha, crith(m) -> creatha
				! scian -> sceana (I) imirt -> imeartha

 
.o.
 i -> [%^FB] || [a|á|%^AE|o|ó|ú|%^UA|%^AO] _ Cons+ %^Lea
				! CHECK WHETHER "u" SHOULD BE HERE TOO???
				! OR DOES "ui" ALWAYS GO TO "o" (see next rule)
				! it appears so ...
				! súil - súl, dúil, glúin
				! cóir - córa, móin - móna
				! deoir - deora, feoil - feola
				! troid - troda, cainteoir - cainteora
				! droim(m) - droma, goin - gona, toil
				! gáir - gártha, tiomáint - tiomána
				! síocháin - síochána, cáisc - cásca
				! stair - startha, flaith(m) - flatha
				! bliain - bliana
				! grósaeir - grósaera (E), traein - traen(E)
				! bádóir - bádóra, buairt(U) -> buartha
				! aoir - aortha (O)
.o.
 u i -> %^FB o || _ Cons+ %^Lea	! cuid -  na coda, fuil - fola
.o.
 [..] -> %^FB o || (a) í _ Cons+ %^Lea 	
				! feadaíl - feadaíola, tír - tíortha
.o.
%^Lea -> []
;
! Noun & Adjective (Gaeilge) Replace Rules
! Elaine Uí Dhonnchadha
!
! (c) January 2001
!
! Athrú   : Ending Changes (^Ath)
!
! 2004 included ^FC in ea -> 0 correction rule 
!***************************************************************************!
define Cons  b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z|%^FC|%^FY;
define Vowel a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú|%^AE|%^AO|%^UA;
read regex é -> %^FC é i || _ %^Ath	! finné -> finnéi+the
!----------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.
 í -> %^FC i || _ %^Ath t	! ainmhí -> ainmhi+the
				! NOTE must fire before ch->í rule as we
				! don't want the new í being turned into i
!----------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.
 i ú -> %^FC i || _ %^Ath t	! deimhniú -> deimhni+the (pl)
.o.
 ú -> %^FC u i || _ %^Ath t	! tarlú -> tarlui+the (pl)

!----------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.
 i ú -> [%^FC ] || _ %^Ath i	! deimhniú -> deimhn+ithe (gen sg)
.o.
!!! ú -> [%^FC ] || _ %^Ath a	! tarlú -> tarl+aithe (gen sg)
 ú -> [%^FC a] || _ %^Ath i	! tarlú -> tarla+ithe (gen sg)

!----------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.
 a í -> [%^FC ] || _ %^Ath a	! cónaí -> cón+aithe (gen sg)


!----------------------------------------------------------------------
! Nouns :final syllable "adh" become "tha|ta" , eg folcadh -> folctha
! moladh -> molta / moltaí
! and "eadh" become "the|te" loiceadh -> loicthe
! and "gt" become "gthe" tarraingt -> tarraingthe
!new 28/3/08
.o.
 m h n %^X a d h -> [%^FC m h a n]  || _ %^Ath (%^Caol) t ! tamhnadh -> tamhanta
.o.
 n l %^X a d h   -> [%^FC n n a l]  || _ %^Ath (%^Caol) t ! ionladh -> ionnalta
.o.
 a n n %^X a d h   -> [%^FC a n]  || _ %^Ath (%^Caol) t ! foirceannadh -> foirceanta
.o.
 n l %^X e a d h   -> [%^FC n n e a l]  || _ %^Ath (%^Caol) t ! inleadh -> innealta
.o.
 d l %^X a d h   -> [%^FC d l a]  || _ %^Ath (%^Caol) t	! codladh -> codlata
.o.
 t h %^X a d h   -> [%^FC ]   || _ %^Ath (%^Caol) t	! leathadh -> leata
.o.
 t h %^X a d h   -> [%^FC ]   || _ %^Ath (%^Caol) t	! leathadh -> leata
.o.
 t e %^X a d h   -> [%^FC ]   || _ %^Ath (%^Caol) t
.o.
 t %^X a d h     -> [%^FC ]   || _ %^Ath (%^Caol) t
.o.
 e a d h     -> [%^FC ]   || %^X _ %^Ath (%^Caol) t
.o.
    g t      -> [%^FC g]  || _ %^Ath (%^Caol) t	! tarrXaingt -> tarrXaingthe
.o.
  a d h      -> [%^FC ]   || %^X _ %^Ath (%^Caol) t
!!.o.
!!  a d h      -> [%^FC ]   ||  [d|n|t|l|s] %^X _ %^Ath (%^Caol) t
!end new
 
!----------------------------------------------------------------------
! Nouns :final syllable "ach"  and "adh" become "aí" , eg bealach 
! "each" and "eadh" become "í"
! stems must be polysyllabic e.g. not beach, sceach etc (teach is an exception)
! Adj Like Nouns :final syllable "ach"  (no "adh"?) become "aí" , eg déanach  - déanaí

.o.
 c h -> %^FC í ,		! bealach -> bealaí, soitheach -> soithí
				! margadh -> margaí, geimhreadh -> geimhrí
 d h -> %^FC í || Vowel+ Cons+ %^X (e) a _ %^Ath (%^Caol) (\t)	! added \t 31/08/06
!----------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.
 e a  -> [] || _ %^FC í %^Ath 	! correction : geimhrea^FCí->geimhr^FCí, 
				! soitheaí->soithí
				! Adj: leochaileaí -> leochailí
!----------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.
 b h -> %^FC a í || _ %^Ath	! leanbh -> leanaí

!----------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.
 d h -> %^FC t || i _ %^Ath %^Lea	! iarraidh(aí) -> iarrait(aí)


!----------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.
 t -> [%^FC ] || n _ %^Ath	! tiomáint -> tiomána  ( was t->a but D3 appenda a)

!----------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.
 t -> %^FC t h || r _ %^Ath	! tagairt -> tagartha, buairt -> buartha

!----------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.
 e -> [%^FC ] || _ %^Ath	! "e" is removed and "í" or "te" is appended
				! buille -> buillí, císte -> cístí
				! míle -> mílte, sloinne -> sloinnte
!----------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.
 i o -> %^FC e a || _ [c|n|s|r] (h t) %^Ath	! sioc(m) -> seaca, 
					! briocht -> breachta 
					! smior(m) -> smeara
					! fios(m) -> feasa, crios(m) -> creasa
					! cion(m) -> ceana
					! gion(m) -> geana
!
!----------------------------------------------------------------------
! Adjectives: final syllable íoch becomes íthí, e.g. buíoch -> buíthí
! AND [(e)á,ó,eo,ua] ch becomes thaí e.g.gnách -> gnáthaí, spleách->spleáthaí???

.o.
 o c h -> [%^FC ] || %^X (?) í _ %^Ath	! buíoch -> buí +thí

.o.
 c h -> [%^FC ] || %^X [á|ó|o|%^UA] _ %^Ath	! sách,sóch,gleoch,díomuach (^UA=ua)

! --- end adj stuff ---

!----------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.
%^Ath -> []

;

! Noun (Gaeilge) Replace Rules
! Elaine Uí Dhonnchadha
! Oct 2003
! INITIAL MUTATION OF 2nd. PART OF COMPOUND
! ^Sé : (Séimhiú) Lenition : insert "h" after certain initial consonants
!***************************************************************************

define Vowel a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú|%^AO|%^IA|%^AE|%^UA;

! Séimhiú (Lenite) the following consonants: b,c,d,f,g,m,p,t
read regex [..] -> h  || %^CB [m|b|c|d|f|g|p|t] _
.o.
! Séimhiú (Lenite) "s" when followed by [a|e|i|o|u|l|n|r|á|é|í|ó|ú]
[..] -> h || %^CB s _ [Vowel|l|n|r] 
.o. 
! remove any h prohibited by dntls rule
! e.g. an-saibhir seanduine
h -> [] || [d|n|t|l|s] (%-) %^CB [d|n|t|l|s] _	
!!.o.	NOW REMOVED IN n-reg-tidy AT THE ENd
!!%^CB -> []	! initial mutation at compound boundary
;
! Noun (Gaeilge) Replace Rules
! Elaine Uí Dhonnchadha
! 12/12/96 - continued March 1998
! 
!****************************************************************************
! Certain vowel combinations will be represented by one symbol as these vowel
! sounds should be treated as a unit.
! DIPHTHONG EXAMPLE
! For example in slenderising "ua" we want "uai" not "uiai".
! LONG VOWEL EXAMPLE
! In cathair (city) the "ai" is syncopated but in cathaoir (chair) "aoi" is not.
!
! (This may reduce network size in places (although it means adding new symbols
! to the alphabet.)
!
! Diphthongs 
!	ua -> U eg bruas ^Caol, buairt ^Lea, díomuach ^Ath (adj.)
!	ia -> I eg scian ^Lea	(NOT IN USE AT PRESENT)
! There are two other diphthongs in Irish but the are not explicitly represented
! orthographically (radharc, etc see Fpóca)
!
! Long Vowels
!	ao -> O saol, gaol, cathaoir (sounds like ee)
!	ae -> E grosaeir, traen ^Lea (sounds like ay)
!
!	Note: sometimes "eo" has a long sound (like ó) eg ceol, gleo
!***************************************************************************

read regex [ a e -> %^AE ]				! Long vowel symbol
!.o.
![ i a -> %^IA ]					! Diphthong symbol

.o.
[ a o -> %^AO ]						! Long vowel symbol

.o.
[ u a -> %^UA ];					! Diphthong symbol
! Noun (Gaeilge) Replace Rules
! Elaine Uí Dhonnchadha
! 12/12/96 - continued March 1998
! January 2001
! INITIAL MUTATIONS
! ^Sé : (Séimhiú) Lenition : insert "h" after certain initial consonants
! ^Urú : Eclipsis
! ^tv & ^hv : Prefix "t-" or "h" to words with an initial vowel
! ^ts : prefix "t" to words starting with "s" followed by "l", "n", "r" or a vowel
! ^Poss : possessive m', d' etc on nouns
!
!xxxx
!***************************************************************************
!DEFINITIONS
!***************************************************************************
define VowelAll a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú|%^AO|%^IA|%^AE|%^UA|A|E|I|O|U|Á|É|Í|Ó|Ú;
define VowelLC a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú|%^AO|%^IA|%^AE|%^UA;
define VowelUC A|E|I|O|U|Á|É|Í|Ó|Ú;
define Len b|c|d|f|g|m|p|t|B|C|D|F|G|M|P|T;
define SLen S|s;
define SWord l|n|r;
!***************************************************************************
!SÉIMHIÚ (LENITION)
!Noun Fem Com Sg / Noun Masc Gen Sg / Noun Voc /Noun IM / Adj / Verb
!***************************************************************************
! Séimhiú (Lenite) the following consonants: b,c,d,f,g,m,p,t
regex [..] -> %^FH h || .#. Len _  ?+ [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]|[%^M %^V]|[%^F %^V]|[%^IM]|[%^Adj]|[%^Verb]|[%^VN]] ?* %^Sé
,,
[..] -> %^FH h || .#. [S|s] _  [l|n|r] VowelLC ?+ 
[[%^F %^C]
|[%^M %^G]
|[%^F %^V]
|[%^M %^V]
|[%^IM]
|[%^Adj]
|[%^Verb]
|[%^VN]] 
?* %^Sé
,,
[..] -> %^FH h || .#. [S|s] _  VowelLC ?* [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]|[%^F %^V]|[%^M %^V]|[%^IM]|[%^Adj]|[%^Verb]|[%^VN]] ?* %^Sé
!!.o.
! Séimhiú (Lenite) "s" when followed by Vowel or l|n|r
!!![..] -> %^FH h || .#. [s|S] _ (%^X) [VowelLC|SWord] ?* [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]|[%^F %^V]|[%^M %^V]|[%^IM]|[%^Adj]|[%^Verb]|[%^VN]] ?* %^Sé
!!![..] -> %^FH h || .#. SLen _  VowelLC ?* [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]|[%^F %^V]|[%^M %^V]|[%^IM]|[%^Adj]|[%^Verb]|[%^VN]] ?* %^Sé
!!![..] -> %^FH h || .#. S _ VowelLC ?* [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]|[%^M %^V]|[%^F %^V]|[%^IM]|[%^Adj]|[%^Verb]|[%^VN]] ?* %^Sé
!!!,,
!!![..] -> %^FH h || .#. S _ VowelLC ?* [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]|[%^F %^V]|[%^M %^V]|[%^IM]|[%^Adj]|[%^Verb]|[%^VN]] ?* %^Sé
!!.o.
!![..] -> %^FH h || .#. s _ VowelLC ?* [[%^F %^C]|[%^M %^G]|[%^F %^V]|[%^M %^V]|[%^IM]|[%^Adj]|[%^Verb]|[%^VN]] ?* %^Sé
!!.o.
!!,,

!!.o.
! VERBS ONLY: d' before vowels & f in Past , Imperfect and Conditional of Verbs p97 no.3
! d'fhéach is split into 2 tokens: d' and fhéach EUD 2004
!![..] -> d ' || .#. _  [VowelAll|f h] ?+ %^Verb ?* %^Sé

.o.
%^Sé -> []
.o.
%^Do -> []
.o.
%^VN -> [] 	! used for séimhiú on f without d' e.g. a fheiceáil not a d'fheiceáil
